Utah statutes.
54-15-106.   Customer to provide equipment necessary to meet applicable code
requirements -- Governing authority may adopt additional reasonable
requirements -- Testing and inspection of interconnection.
(1)  Each customer participating in a net metering program shall provide at
the customer's expense all equipment necessary to meet applicable local and
national standards regarding electrical and fire safety, power quality, and
interconnection requirements established by the National Electrical Code, the
National Electrical Safety Code, the Institute of Electrical and Electronics
Engineers, and Underwriters Laboratories.
(2)  After appropriate notice and opportunity for public comment, the
governing authority may by rule adopt additional reasonable safety, power
quality, and interconnection requirements for customer generation systems that
the governing authority considers to be necessary to protect public safety and
system reliability.
(3) (a)  If a customer participating in a net metering program complies with
requirements referred to under Subsection (1) and additional requirements
established under Subsection (2), an electrical corporation may not require
that customer to:
(i)  perform or pay for additional tests; or
(ii)  purchase additional liability insurance.
(b)  An electrical corporation may not be held directly or indirectly liable
for permitting or continuing to permit an interconnection of a customer
generation system to the electrical corporation's system or for an act or
omission of a customer participating in a net metering program for loss,
injury, or death to a third party.
(4)  An electrical corporation may test and inspect an interconnection at
times that the electrical corporation considers necessary to ensure the safety
of electrical workers and to preserve the integrity of the electric power
grid.
(5)  The electrical function, operation, or capacity of a customer generation
system, at the point of connection to the electrical corporation's
distribution system, may not compromise the quality of service to the
electrical corporation's other customers.
